Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.060

Strip, body cavity searches—Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to establish policies regarding the practice of strip searching persons booked into holding, detention, or local correctional facilities. It is the intent of the legislature to restrict the practice of strip searching and body cavity searching persons booked into holding, detention, or local correctional facilities to those situations where such searches are necessary.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 42: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1983." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 10.]

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 42: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 9.]